Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 13 Reservation of Question to Supreme Court

Cross references. —

As to costs in reserved cases, see Rule 8, Sup. Ct.

As to findings in district court in connection with questions reserved to supreme court, see Rule 52, W.R.C.P.

Provisions construed in pari materia. —

Sections

1-13-101

to

1-13-103

, pertaining to reserved constitutional questions, along with Rule 52(c), W.R.C.P., must be read in pari materia with §§

1-13-104

to

1-13-107

, pertaining to certified questions. In re Certified Question from United States Dist. Court, 549 P.2d 1310,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. 1976).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

5 Am. Jur. 2d Appeal and Error §§ 967 to 979.

4 C.J.S. Appeal and Error § 19.

§ 1-13-101.
Constitutional questions; generally.

When an important and
difficult constitutional question arises in a proceeding pending before
the district court on motion of either party or upon his own motion
the judge of the district court may cause the question to be reserved
and sent to the supreme court for its decision.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 66, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 4276; Laws 1903, ch. 72, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 5136; C.S. 1920, § 6398; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 110; R.S. 1931, § 89-5001; C.S. 1945, § 3-5501; W.S. 1957, § 1-191; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Section constitutional. —

This section, authorizing district court to reserve important and difficult questions arising in a cause for decision of the supreme court, is constitutional. State v. Crocker, 5 Wyo. 385, 40 P. 681,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1895).

Rule 52, W.R.C.P., implements this section.

Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. Prosser, 501 P.2d 1,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 301

(Wyo. 1972).

Not mandatory that district judge reserve questions. —

There is nothing in this section or in Rule 52, W.R.C.P., which indicates a mandatory direction to a district judge to reserve important and difficult constitutional questions to the supreme court each time he is requested to do so. Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. Prosser, 501 P.2d 1,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 301

(Wyo. 1972).

Rather, district court must exercise its sound discretion

in determining when a constitutional question is so important and difficult that it ought to be reserved to the supreme court. Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. Prosser, 501 P.2d 1,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 301

(Wyo. 1972).

Supreme court's jurisdiction to decide questions reserved for its determination is limited

to important, difficult constitutional questions arising in actions pending in the district court. State v. Smart, 18 Wyo. 436, 110 P. 715,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1910).

Only pending constitutional questions may be reserved. —

No question except a constitutional question is authorized to be reserved to the supreme court. White v. Board of County Comm'rs, 77 Wyo. 246, 313 P.2d 484,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1957).

Under this section, only pending constitutional question can be reserved to the supreme court upon order of a district court. State v. Keefe, 17 Wyo. 227, 98 P. 122,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1908).

Matter referable. —

Under this section, question as to validity of $55,000 worth of Crook county bonds, bearing date May 1, 1891, was sufficiently important and difficult, to authorize its reference to the supreme court. Board of County Comm'rs v. Rollins Inv. Co., 3 Wyo. 470, 27 P. 683,

1891 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1891).

And matter not referable. —

This section does not authorize district court to submit question whether plaintiff's petition, to which a general demurrer (now motion to dismiss) is interposed, states facts sufficient to constitute a cause of action. Jenkins v. City of Cheyenne, 12 Wyo. 79, 73 P. 758,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(1903). See Rule 7, W.R.C.P.

Statute must appear unconstitutional as to person attacking
it. —

It is not sufficient for a party to say that a statute is unconstitutional as to other persons or classes of persons, but it must appear that it is unconstitutional as to person attacking it. Public Serv. Comm'n v. Grimshaw, 49 Wyo. 158, 53 P.2d 1,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1935).

And specific constitutional provision violated must be pointed
out. —

The supreme court will not answer any reserved constitutional questions unless the specific constitutional provision claimed to be violated has been pointed out. White v. Board of County Comm'rs, 77 Wyo. 246, 313 P.2d 484,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1957).

Unless questions specify the constitutional provision alleged to be violated, supreme court is not required to answer said questions. State ex rel. Voiles v. Johnson County High Sch., 43 Wyo. 494, 5 P.2d 255,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1931).

Supreme court is not required to answer reserved questions from district court involving constitutionality of a statute where specific constitutional provision asserted to be violated by it has not been designated. Taxpayers' League of Carbon County v. McPherson, 49 Wyo. 251, 54 P.2d 897,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1936).

Insufficient orders. —

Order of district court certifying that there is a question reviewable under this section, but not stating what such question is, brings up nothing for determination. Corey v. Corey, 3 Wyo. 210, 19 P. 443,

1888 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1888).

An order, made prior to amendatory act, finding that difficult and new questions had arisen in a suit, and ordering that clerk prepare and certify record and questions involved to the supreme court, but failing to state what questions were, was insufficient to bring the case within the proviso of the amendatory act. Smith v. Healy, 12 Wyo. 218, 75 P. 430,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1904).

Question sufficiently presented. —

Though questions reserved for supreme court should be specifically stated by trial court, yet, where question sought to be reserved was clearly stated in stipulation of counsel, this was sufficient to present question for review. Board of Comm'rs v. Rollins, 9 Wyo. 281, 62 P. 351,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1900).

Question must first be presented to district court. —

The supreme court will limit its answers to submitted constitutional questions to questions which have been specifically and fully argued. Public Serv. Comm'n v. Grimshaw, 49 Wyo. 158, 53 P.2d 1,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1935).

Answers to constitutional questions will be limited to those which have been specifically phrased and fully argued. Miller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 79 Wyo. 502, 337 P.2d 262,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1959).

And that court must dispose of all preliminary matters before
supreme court asked to determine constitutional problems. —

Constitutional questions submitted to the supreme court must be of such a nature and so vital that there will be nothing more for the district court to determine in order to dispose of the case; in other words, that court must dispose of all preliminary matters, such as questions of statutory construction and factual questions, before the supreme court should be asked to determine constitutional problems in the case. State ex rel. Fawcett v. Board of County Comm'rs, 73 Wyo. 69, 273 P.2d 188,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1954).

Supreme court is without jurisdiction to consider submitted constitutional questions until all necessary and controlling questions of fact in case are disposed of by trial court. State ex rel. Keefe v. Jones, 62 Wyo. 61, 161 P.2d 135,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1945).

Under rulings of supreme court, said court has no jurisdiction to decide any alleged constitutional questions until all other questions are disposed of in the pending litigation. Roberts v. Rock Springs, 52 Wyo. 89, 68 P.2d 891,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1937).

The supreme court will not consider a reserved constitutional question until there is nothing left for the trial court to do but apply the supreme court's answer to the question or questions and enter judgment consistent with the answer or answers. In re Certified Question from United States Dist. Court, 549 P.2d 1310,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. 1976).

When the supreme court decides a constitutional question reserved to it, there should be nothing left for the trial court to do but apply it and, depending upon the answer, either proceed at once to sentence and enter a judgment of conviction and sentence, or dismiss the charges. State v. Rosachi, 549 P.2d 318,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1976).

Where information was demurred to (now objected to by motion), first, because facts alleged did not constitute an offense and, second, because statute was unconstitutional, supreme court had no jurisdiction to determine constitutional question on a case reserved in advance of determination of first ground of demurrer (now motion), since, if that ground should be sustained, other would become immaterial. State v. Kelley, 17 Wyo. 335, 98 P. 886,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(1909). See Rule 16, W.R.Cr.P.

The supreme court should not address, and resolve, the constitutional issue in those instances in which the trial court has not disposed of all of the necessary, and controlling, questions of fact and has not set forth its conclusions of law with respect to all questions other than the constitutional question. Rodabaugh v. Ross, 807 P.2d 380,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1991).

Thus trial court must decide meaning and effect of statutes
in question. —

The supreme court has no jurisdiction to pass upon a reserved constitutional question until after the trial court has disposed of, and has decided, the meaning and effect of the statutes in question necessarily arising in a case. White v. Board of County Comm'rs, 77 Wyo. 246, 313 P.2d 484,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1957).

Questions of statutory construction and those arising because of incompatibility of statutes, or in course of interpreting effect of their language, raise no constitutional question which may be reserved for supreme court. State ex rel. Lee v. Continental Oil Co., 48 Wyo. 152, 43 P.2d 686,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1935).

In a suit challenging the legality of a bond issue, the petition presented two distinct questions, namely, (1) whether the statute under which the bonds in question were purportedly issued on its face authorized the issuance of the bonds, and (2) if the statute did authorize the issuance of the bonds, then whether the statute was unconstitutional. Where it appeared that the trial court had not decided question (1), the supreme court declined to pass upon question (2), which was reserved to it under this section. White v. Board of County Comm'rs, 77 Wyo. 246, 313 P.2d 484,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1957) (wherein the court stated that the statutory provisions permitting the submission of reserved constitutional questions merely hinders and delays the speedy disposition of cases and should be repealed).

Trial court's certificate is not controlling

in determining whether case to resolve reserved constitutional question should be returned to trial court with submitted question unanswered. State ex rel. Keefe v. Jones, 62 Wyo. 61, 161 P.2d 135,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1945).

Examination by supreme court. —

On reserved case, supreme court will examine original papers to determine whether reserved constitutional questions arise in the action and whether determination is necessary to dispose of the case. State ex rel. Keefe v. Jones, 62 Wyo. 61, 161 P.2d 135,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1945).

Supreme court cannot make any order in case in which constitutional questions have been reserved

for its consideration. State v. Berry, 36 Wyo. 257, 254 P. 488,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1927).

On reservation of constitutional questions, supreme court cannot order district court to vacate order reserving questions or dismissal of action against defendant. State v. Berry, 36 Wyo. 257, 254 P. 488,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1927).

Tax held unconstitutional. —

In a cause reviewed or determined under this chapter, it was held that a tax to aid a fair association was unconstitutional and void. Board of County Comm'rs v. Union Pac. R.R., 25 Wyo. 463, 171 P. 668,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1918).

Applied

in

Bulova Watch Co. v. Zale Jewelry Co., 371 P.2d 409,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 1962); Galesburg Construction Co. v. Board of Trustees, 641 P.2d 745,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 308

(Wyo. 1982).

Quoted

in

State ex rel. Wyo. Farm Loan Bd. v. Herschler, 622 P.2d 1378,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1981).

Stated

in

Powell v. Daily, 712 P.2d 356,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 448

(Wyo. 1986).

Cited

in

State v. Crocker, 5 Wyo. 385, 40 P. 681,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(1895); State v. Peterson, 27 Wyo. 185, 194 P. 342,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 33

, 13 A.L.R. 1284 (1920); Simpkin v. Rock Springs, 33 Wyo. 166, 237 P. 245,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(1925); Hanson v. Town of Greybull, 63 Wyo. 467, 183 P.2d 393,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(1947); State v. Yazzie, 67 Wyo. 256, 218 P.2d 482,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(1950); State ex rel. Fire Fighters Local v. Kingham, 420 P.2d 254,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(Wyo. 1966); State ex rel. Fire Fighters Local 946 v. Laramie, 437 P.2d 295,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1968); Harding v. State, 478 P.2d 64,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo. 1970); County Court Judges Ass'n v. Sidi, 752 P.2d 960 (Wyo. 1988); Allhusen v. State ex rel. Wyo. Mental Health Professions Licensing Bd., 898 P.2d 878,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 1995), (decided prior to 2001 amendments to the Mental Health Professions Practice Act); RM v. Washakie County Sch. Dist. No. One, 2004 WY 162, 102 P.3d 868,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 208

(2004).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Constitutional Law — Equal Protection Analysis. Awarding Public Works Contracts: Granting Preference to Resident Bidders. Galesburg Construction Co. v. Board of Trustees, 641 P.2d 745,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 308

(Wyo. 1982),” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 393 (1983).

For article, “Supreme Court Jurisdiction and the Wyoming Constitution: Justice v. Judicial Restraint,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 159 (1985).

§ 1-13-102.
Constitutional questions; clerk's duties; rules.

When a question is reserved
to the supreme court, the clerk of the district court shall transmit
the original papers in the case involving the question to the clerk
of the supreme court, who shall place the papers on file. The matter
shall then stand for hearing by the supreme court, and the supreme
court may make rules of procedure as it deems proper for the speedy
hearing of the proceeding.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 66, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 4277; C.S. 1910, § 5137; C.S. 1920, § 6399; R.S. 1931, § 89-5002; C.S. 1945, § 3-5502; W.S. 1957, § 1-192; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Stated

in

State v. Rosachi, 549 P.2d 318,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1976).

Cited

in

State v. Kelley, 17 Wyo. 335, 98 P. 886,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(1909); Board of County Comm'rs v. Union Pac. R.R., 25 Wyo. 463, 171 P. 668,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(1918); State v. Peterson, 27 Wyo. 185, 194 P. 342,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 33

, 13 A.L.R. 1284 (1920); Simpkin v. Rock Springs, 33 Wyo. 166, 237 P. 245,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(1925); State v. Berry, 36 Wyo. 257, 254 P. 488,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(1927).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Supreme Court Jurisdiction and the Wyoming Constitution: Justice v. Judicial Restraint,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 159 (1985).

§ 1-13-103.
Constitutional questions; remand for further proceedings.

Upon hearing the supreme
court may remand the case together with the original papers to the
district court for further proceedings. The clerk of the supreme court
shall certify the order of remand to the clerk of the district court,
who shall immediately enter the case upon the journal of the district
court, and when entered the order stands as the order of the district
court.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 66, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 4278; C.S. 1910, § 5138; C.S. 1920, § 6400; R.S. 1931, § 89-5003; C.S. 1945, § 3-5503; W.S. 1957, § 1-193; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Jurisdiction of district court concluded until mandate from
supreme court sent down. —

When a case comes to the supreme court on reserved constitutional questions, the jurisdiction of the district court is concluded for the time being, as in ordinary appeal cases, until the mandate from the supreme court is sent down to the trial court. State ex rel. Fawcett v. Board of County Comm'rs, 73 Wyo. 69, 273 P.2d 188,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1954).

And judgment entered before supreme court's mandate issues
is void. —

When a case comes to the supreme court on reserved constitutional questions and the jurisdiction of the district court is concluded for the time being, a judgment in the case by the district court during that time, and before the supreme court's mandate is issued, is entirely void, since the court has no jurisdiction to act. State ex rel. Fawcett v. Board of County Comm'rs, 73 Wyo. 69, 273 P.2d 188,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1954).

Stated

in

State v. Rosachi, 549 P.2d 318,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1976).

Cited

in

Board of County Comm'rs v. Union Pac. R.R., 25 Wyo. 463, 171 P. 668,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(1918); State v. Peterson, 27 Wyo. 185, 194 P. 342,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 33

, 13 A.L.R. 1284 (1920); Simpkin v. Rock Springs, 33 Wyo. 166, 237 P. 245,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(1925); State v. Berry, 36 Wyo. 257, 254 P. 488,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(1927).

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
205.07 (Matthew Bender).

§ 1-13-104.
Questions from federal courts; generally.

W.S.

1-13-104

through

1-13-107

is cited as the “Federal Court State Law Certificate
Procedure Act”.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 78, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 1-193.1; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Applied

in

Harvey v. GMC, 739 P.2d 763,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 476

(Wyo. 1987); B & W Glass, Inc. v. Weather Shield Mfg., Inc., 829 P.2d 809,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1992); Sinclair Oil Corp. v. Republic Ins. Co., 929 P.2d 535,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 1996).

Cited

in

Schneider Nat'l, Inc. v. Holland Hitch Co., 843 P.2d 561,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1992); Oler v. United States, 2001 WY 9, 17 P.3d 27,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 2001).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Certified Question — Exercising the Power to Answer Federal Court Certification of State Law Questions, In re Certified Question from United States Dist. Court, 549 P.2d 1310,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. 1976),” see XII Land & Water L. Rev. 337 (1977).

§ 1-13-105.
Questions from federal courts; definitions.

As used in this act:

“Certificate procedure” means the procedure authorized herein by which a federal court in disposing of a cause pending before it submits a question of state law to the supreme court for determination;

“Federal court” means any court of the United States of America including the supreme court of the United States, courts of appeal, district courts and any other court created by act of congress;

“Supreme court” means the supreme court of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 78, § 1; 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Applied

in

Sinclair Oil Corp. v. Republic Ins. Co., 929 P.2d 535,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 1996).

§ 1-13-106.
Questions from federal courts; authority of supreme court.

The supreme court may
answer questions of law certified to it by a federal court when requested
by the certifying court if there are involved in any proceeding before
the federal court questions of law of this state which may be determinative
of the cause then pending in the federal court, and as to which it
appears to the federal court there is no controlling precedent in
the existing decisions of the supreme court.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 78, § 1; 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

It is not mandatory that supreme court answer

certified questions. In re Certified Question from United States Dist. Court, 549 P.2d 1310,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. 1976).

Court's role in certified question cases does not include fact finding.

Reliance Ins. Co. v. Chevron U.S.A., 713 P.2d 766,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 464

(Wyo. 1986).

Applied

in

Sinclair Oil Corp. v. Republic Ins. Co., 929 P.2d 535,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 1996).

Quoted

in

Adkins v. Sky Blue, Inc., 701 P.2d 549,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 486

(Wyo. 1985).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Certified Question — Exercising the Power to Answer Federal Court Certification of State Law Questions, In re Certified Question from United States Dist. Court, 549 P.2d 1310,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. 1976),” see XII Land & Water L. Rev. 337 (1977).

§ 1-13-107.
Questions from federal courts; rules.

The supreme court may
adopt rules of practice and procedure to implement or otherwise facilitate
utilization of certificate procedure.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 78, § 1; 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Applied

in

Sinclair Oil Corp. v. Republic Ins. Co., 929 P.2d 535,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 1996).